Utah statutes.
58-37f-402.   Online tutorial and test relating to the database -- Fees -- Rulemaking authority -- Continuing professional education credit.

(1)  The division shall develop an online tutorial and an online test for registration to use the database that provides instruction regarding, and tests, the following:

(a)  the purpose of the database;

(b)  how to access and use the database;

(c)  the law relating to:

(i)  the use of the database; and

(ii)  the information submitted to, and obtained from, the database; and

(d)  basic knowledge that is important for all people who prescribe controlled substances to know in order to help ensure the health and safety of an individual to whom a controlled substance is prescribed.

(2)  The division shall design the test described in this section as follows:

(a)  an individual shall answer all of the questions correctly in order to pass the test;

(b)  an individual shall be permitted to immediately retake the portion of the test that the individual answers incorrectly as many times as necessary for the individual to pass the test; and

(c)  after an individual takes the test, the test software shall:

(i)  immediately inform the individual of the number of questions that were answered incorrectly;

(ii)  provide the correct answers;

(iii)  replay the portion of the tutorial that relates to the incorrectly answered questions; and

(iv)  ask the individual the incorrectly answered questions again.

(3)  The division shall design the tutorial and test so that it is possible to take the tutorial and complete the test in 20 minutes or less, if the individual answers all of the questions correctly on the first attempt.

(4)  The division shall ensure that the tutorial and test described in this section are fully functional and available for use online on or before November 1, 2010.

(5)  The division shall impose a fee, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, on an individual who takes the test described in this section, to pay the costs incurred by the division to:

(a)  develop, implement, and administer the tutorial and test described in this section; and

(b)  fulfill the other duties imposed on the division under this part.

(6)  The division may make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to:

(a)  develop, implement, and administer the tutorial and test described in this section; and

(b)  fulfill the other duties imposed on the division under this part.

(7)  The Department of Health shall assist the division in developing the portion of the test described in Subsection (1)(d).

(8)  Completing the online tutorial and passing the online test described in this section shall count as 1/2 hour of continuing professional education under Subsection 58-37-6.5(1)(a).

